Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3956
Board; administration; limitation on expenses.

The board may contract for the necessary office space, furniture, stationery, printing, and personnel services useful or necessary for the administration of the Dairy Industry Development Act. The total administrative costs and expenses of the board shall not exceed five percent of the annual assessments collected in accordance with section 2-3958.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 9.